Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-130] Resistance, breach of arrest,
and escape. Any person subject to this chapter who resists apprehension or
breaks arrest or who escapes from physical restraint lawfully imposed shall be
punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next